trunk/resultats/catalan_i.aff
flag *K:    # Quatre formes amb canvi d'accent (accent greu)
    A R I                > -ARI,ÀRIA            # partidària  2.
    A C I                > -ACI,ÀCIA            # acantàcia
    A D I                > -ADI,ÀDIA            # accàdia
    O R I                > -ORI,ÒRIA            # abjuratòria
    E M I                > -EMI,ÈMIA            # abstèmia
    O L I                > -OLI,ÒLIA            # caducifòlia
    O G E N              > -OGEN,ÒGENA          # exògena
    O G I N              > -OGIN,ÒGINA          # misògina
    [AEIOU]              > S                    # partidaris  3.
    O G E N              > -OGEN,ÒGENS          # exògens
    O G I N              > -OGIN,ÒGINS          # misògins
    A R I                > -ARI,ÀRIES           # partidàries 4.
    A D I                > -ADI,ÀDIES           # accàdies
    A C I                > -ACI,ÀCIES           # acantàcies
    O R I                > -ORI,ÒRIES           # abjuratòries
    E M I                > -EMI,ÈMIES           # abstèmies
    O L I                > -OLI,ÒLIES           # caducifòlies
    O G E N              > -OGEN,ÒGENES         # exògenes
    O G I N              > -OGIN,ÒGINES         # misògines

flag *L:    # Quatre formes amb canvi d'accent (accent agut)
    I N I                > -INI,ÍNIA            # abissínia 2.
    I G I                > -IGI,ÍGIA            # frígia
    .                    > S                    # abissinis 3.
    I N I                > -INI,ÍNIES           # abissinis 4.
    I G I                > -IGI,ÍGIES           # frígies
