trunk/resultats/catalan_i.dic
abissini/LVY
abjuratori/KVY
absolutori/KVY
abstemi/KVY
acantaci/KVY
acantopterigi/LVY
accadi/KVY
accessori/KVY
aciculifoli/KVY
acidogen/KVY
aclamatori/KVY
acrogen/KVY
acrogin/KVY
actuari/KVY
acusatori/KVY
adjudicatari/KVY
admonitori/KVY
adulatori/KVY
adversari/KVY
agrari/KVY
agroalimentari/KVY
aleatori/KVY
alimentari/KVY
al·lergogen/KVY
al·liaci/KVY
al·logen/KVY
al·lucinatori/KVY
al·lucinogen/KVY
amatori/KVY
ambulatori/KVY
amentaci/KVY
amilaci/KVY
ampul·laci/KVY
anacrogin/KVY
androgen/KVY
androgin/KVY
anovulatori/KVY
antiinflamatori/KVY
antiparasitari/KVY
antiparlamentari/KVY
antiquari/KVY
antireglamentari/KVY
antirevolucionari/KVY
antirotatori/KVY
antitrinitari/KVY
apol·lini/LVY
apotecari/KVY
aprovatori/KVY
aranzelari/KVY
aratori/KVY
arbitrari/KVY
arbitratori/KVY
arbori/DKVY
arenaci/KVY
ari/KVY
arrendatari/KVY
articulatori/KVY
ascogen/KVY
aspiratori/KVY
assembleari/KVY
assertori/KVY
assimilatori/KVY
atemptatori/KVY
atrabiliari/KVY
autogen/KVY
autogestionari/KVY
autoimmunitari/KVY
autoritari/KVY
avenaci/KVY
aviari/KVY
balneari/K
bancari/K
becari/K
beneficiari/K
bibliotecari/K
bicorpori/K
binari/K
bitini/L
bohemi/K
bonifaci/K
borsari/K
brevilini/L
butiraci/K
caducifoli/K
calcari/K
calculatori/K
camforaci/K
canari/EK
carcerari/K
carcinogen/K
cardiaci/K
cari/K
cariogen/K
cartaci/K
casernari/K
caudatari/K
cebaci/K
celibatari/K
censatari/K
centenari/EK
ceroferari/K
cesari/K
cessionari/K
cinerari/K
cinquantenari/K
circulatori/K
citatori/K
coarrendatari/K
coccigi/L
coccini/L
columnari/K
col·latari/K
col·legatari/K
col·lusori/K
comanditari/K
combinatori/K
comendatari/K
cometari/K
comissari/K
comissori/K
comminatori/K
commonitori/K
comodatari/K
compensatori/K
complementari/K
completori/K
compromissari/K
compromissori/K
compulsori/K
comunitari/K
concessionari/K
conciliatori/K
concrecionari/K
concubinari/K
concussionari/K
condemnatori/K
confidenciari/K
confirmatori/K
confusionari/K
congratulatori/K
conidiogen/K
consanguini/L
consectari/K
conservatori/K
consignatari/K
consiliari/K
consolatori/K
consuetudinari/K
contestatari/K
contradictori/K
contrarevolucionari/K
contrari/K
contributari/K
convocatori/K
coordinatori/K
coplanari/K
copropietari/K
coreligionari/K
coriaci/K
coronari/K
corpori/K
corsari/K
crematori/K
cretaci/K
cruciferari/K
crustaci/K
culinari/K
curvilini/L
daci/K
decisori/K
declamatori/K
declaratori/K
declinatori/K
decretori/K
dedicatori/K
deficitari/K
delegatori/K
delusori/K
demeritori/K
denari/EK
denegatori/K
dentari/K
denunciatori/K
depilatori/K
deprecatori/K
depuratori/K
derisori/K
derogatori/K
desenari/K
desinflamatori/K
despossessori/K
destil·latori/K
destinatari/K
dextrorotatori/K
diari/K
difamatori/K
dignatari/K
dignitari/K
dilatori/K
dimissionari/K
dinerari/K
dipositari/K
dipsogen/K
disciplinari/K
discriminatori/K
divisionari/K
divisori/K
doctrinari/K
domiciliari/K
donatari/K
dori/K
drupaci/K
electrogen/KVY
eleusini/LVY
elevatori/KVY
eliminatori/KVY
embrionari/KVY
emigratori/KVY
emissari/KVY
empresari/KVY
emuntori/KVY
endevinatori/KVY
endogen/KVY
endossatari/KVY
eoli/KVY
epilatori/KVY
ericaci/KVY
erogen/KVY
erotogen/KVY
escripturari/KVY
esporogen/KVY
estacionari/KVY
estatuari/KVY
estatutari/KVY
esteatopigi/LVY
estentori/KVY
estepari/KVY
estercorari/KVY
esternutatori/KVY
estimatori/KVY
estipendiari/KVY
estrafolari/KVY
etoli/KVY
evaporatori/KVY
evocatori/KVY
exclamatori/KVY
excretori/KVY
exculpatori/KVY
execratori/KVY
executori/KVY
exhalatori/KVY
exhibitori/KVY
exhortatori/KVY
exogen/KVY
expedicionari/KVY
expiatori/KVY
expiratori/KVY
explanatori/KVY
exploratori/KVY
expurgatori/KVY
extraordinari/KVY
extraparlamentari/KVY
fagocitari/K
falsari/K
farinaci/K
fedatari/K
ferroviari/K
feudatari/K
fibrinogen/K
fideïcomissari/K
fiduciari/K
filogin/K
fitosanitari/K
fluxionari/K
foliaci/K
formulari/K
fornicari/K
fotogen/K
fraccionari/K
fragmentari/K
frigi/L
fructuari/K
frumentaci/K
frumentari/K
frustratori/K
fulminatori/K
fulmini/DL
fumigatori/K
funcionari/K
funerari/K
furfuraci/K
futurari/K
gallinaci/K
gal·linaci/K
genitourinari/K
geostacionari/K
giratori/K
glicogen/K
glucogen/K
glumaci/K
gratulatori/K
gravitatori/K
gregari/K
gustatori/K
hebdomadari/KVY
hederaci/KVY
herbaci/KVY
herbolari/KVY
hereditari/KVY
herniari/KVY
heterospori/KVY
hiperbori/KVY
hipogin/KVY
hipotecari/KVY
histogen/KVY
honorari/KVY
horari/KVY
hospitalari/KVY
humanitari/KVY
igualitari/KVY
il·literari/KVY
il·lusori/KVY
imaginari/KVY
immeritori/KVY
immigratori/KVY
immissari/KVY
immobiliari/KVY
immunitari/KVY
immunogen/KVY
imperatori/KVY
impetratori/KVY
implacentari/KVY
imprecatori/KVY
incendiari/KVY
incorpori/DKVY
increpatori/KVY
inculpatori/KVY
indagatori/KVY
indiciari/KVY
indoari/KVY
infamatori/KVY
inflamatori/KVY
inhibitori/KVY
inhospitalari/KVY
innecessari/KVY
insatisfactori/KVY
insolidari/KVY
inspiratori/KVY
instrumentari/KVY
interdisciplinari/KVY
interlocutori/KVY
intermediari/KVY
interplanetari/KVY
intimatori/KVY
intimidatori/KVY
intracomunitari/KVY
introductori/KVY
invocatori/KVY
involuntari/KVY
irrisori/KVY
isogin/KVY
isospori/KVY
itinerari/KVY
jaculatori/K
judiciari/K
juratori/K
laci/K
lacrimogen/K
lapidari/K
latifoli/K
latitudinari/K
laudatori/K
lauraci/K
laurifoli/K
laurini/L
legatari/K
legatori/K
legionari/K
legitimari/K
levorotatori/K
licitatori/K
liliaci/K
lisogen/K
literari/K
litogen/K
llegendari/K
llibertari/K
longilini/L
majoritari/K
malacopterigi/L
mamari/K
mandatari/K
mansionari/K
marmori/K
masticatori/K
masturbatori/K
medicamentari/K
megari/K
membranaci/K
mercedari/K
mercenari/K
meritori/K
micaci/K
micorizogen/K
migratori/K
milionari/K
mil·lenari/K
minoritari/K
misogin/K
mixtilini/L
mobiliari/EK
monetari/K
monitori/K
monogin/K
moratori/K
morfogen/K
mortuori/K
multimilionari/K
multitudinari/K
musivari/K
mutuatari/K
narratori/K
natatori/K
necessari/K
necrogen/K
nectari/K
nefari/K
neogen/K
nobiliari/K
nonagenari/K
notari/K
notori/K
numerari/K
obituari/KVY
obligatori/KVY
ocraci/KVY
octogenari/KVY
octogin/KVY
olfactori/KVY
olivaci/KVY
olivari/KVY
oncogen/KVY
ondulatori/KVY
onerari/KVY
operari/KVY
operatori/KVY
opiaci/KVY
oratori/EKVY
orbitari/KVY
ordinari/KVY
organogen/KVY
originari/KVY
oscil·latori/KVY
osteogen/KVY
ostraci/KVY
paleaci/K
paleogen/K
palmari/K
pamfletari/K
papilionaci/K
parasitari/K
parcel·lari/K
paritari/K
parlamentari/K
partidari/K
patibulari/K
patogen/K
pecuari/K
pecuniari/K
penitenciari/K
pensionari/K
perdulari/K
peremptori/K
perennifoli/K
perfuntori/K
permissionari/K
persecutori/K
perspiratori/K
peticionari/K
petitori/K
pigmentari/K
piogen/K
piretogen/K
piscatori/K
pituïtari/K
placentari/K
plagiari/K
planetari/K
planifoli/K
planocaducifoli/K
planoperennifoli/K
plaquetari/K
plebiscitari/K
plenari/K
plenipotenciari/K
pluridisciplinari/K
pomaci/K
porraci/K
portuari/K
possessori/K
postoperatori/K
precari/K
premonitori/K
preoperatori/K
preparatori/K
presidiari/K
pressupostari/K
prestatari/K
primari/K
prioritari/K
probatori/K
proditori/K
prohibitori/K
proletari/K
promissori/K
propiciatori/K
propietari/K
prostibulari/K
protectori/K
proterogin/K
protestatari/K
protocol·lari/K
provisori/K
provocatori/K
psicogen/K
purificatori/K
quaternari/K
quinquagenari/K
reaccionari/K
recordatori/K
rectilini/L
redhibitori/K
referendari/K
reformatori/K
refutatori/K
reivindicatori/K
remissori/K
renunciatari/K
reprovatori/K
requisitori/K
rescriptori/K
resolutori/K
restitutori/K
reverberatori/K
revolucionari/K
ripuari/K
rosaci/K
rotatori/K
rutinari/K
sacrococcigi/L
saltuari/K
sanguinari/K
sanguini/L
saponaci/K
sebaci/K
secretori/K
secundari/K
sedimentari/K
selaci/K
sensori/K
septuagenari/K
sexagenari/K
similitudinari/K
solidari/K
sotsarrendatari/K
subcontrari/K
subrogatori/K
substitutori/K
successori/K
sumatori/K
supererogatori/K
suplementari/K
suplicatori/K
tavernari/K
temerari/K
teratogen/K
termogen/K
testaci/K
tintori/K
traci/DK
transitori/K
trentenari/K
trinitari/K
tubari/K
tumulari/K
turiferari/K
ultracentenari/KVY
unitari/KVY
urinari/KVY
usuari/KVY
usurari/KVY
valetudinari/K
venatori/K
vesicatori/K
vexatori/K
vibratori/K
vicissitudinari/K
violaci/K
voluntari/K
vulnerari/K
